Utah statutes.
16-6a-821.   Contract rights with respect to officers.

(1)  The appointment of an officer does not itself create contract rights.

(2) (a)  An officer's removal does not affect the officer's contract rights, if any, with the nonprofit corporation.

(b)  An officer's resignation does not affect the nonprofit corporation's contract rights, if any, with the officer.



Enacted by Chapter 300, 2000 General Session

